Utah statutes.
20A-1-502.   Midterm vacancies in office of United States representative or senator.

(1)  When a vacancy occurs for any reason in the office of a representative in Congress, the governor shall issue a proclamation calling an election to fill the vacancy.

(2) (a)  When a vacancy occurs in the office of U.S. senator, it shall be filled for the unexpired term at the next regular general election.

(b)  The governor shall appoint a person to serve as U.S. senator until the vacancy is filled by election from one of three persons nominated by the state central committee of the same political party as the prior officeholder.

